Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.132

License, certification—Applications—Fee—Expiration dates.

Any person applying for a license or certification authorized under the provisions of this chapter shall file an application on a form prescribed by the director.

(1) The application shall state the license or certification and the classification(s) for which the applicant is applying and the method in which the pesticides are to be applied.

(2) For all classes of licenses, all applicants shall be at least 18 years of age on the date that the application is made.

(3) Application for a license to apply pesticides shall be accompanied by the required fee. No license may be issued until the required fee has been received by the department.

(4) Each classification of license issued under this chapter except the limited private applicator and the rancher private applicator expires annually on a date set by rule by the director. Limited and rancher private applicator licenses expire on the fifth December 31st after issuance. Renewal applications shall be filed on or before the applicable expiration date.

[ 2023 c 186 s 3; 2004 c 100 s 4; 1997 c 242 s 16; 1994 c 283 s 16; 1991 c 109 s 35; 1989 c 380 s 44.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2004 c 100: See note following RCW 17.21.020.